Florida, session 2026, SB1176.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âPresent subsection (2) of section 205.194, 17 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (3), and a new 18 subsection (2) is added to that section, to read: 19 205.194âProhibition of local business tax receipt without 20 exhibition of state license or registration.â 21 (2)âAny person applying for or renewing a local business 22 tax receipt to practice any profession or engage in or manage 23 any business or occupation, which conducts transactions subject 24 to the sanction programs administered by the Office of Foreign 25 Assets Control of the United States Department of the Treasury 26 must exhibit an active license or authorization, or proof of 27 copy of the same, from the Office of Foreign Assets before such 28 local receipt may be issued. Online renewals may provide for 29 electronic certification by an applicant to meet this 30 requirement. 31 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.